src/fst/phonology.xfscript
# phonological alternations common to all pronominal prefixes


# prefix + take, takwa, takeni + root starting with h,k,y,t = hske, hskwa, hskeni
define taHs {ta} -> {hse} || wordChar+ ppMarker _ [{ke}] rootBM [ k | h | y | t];

# prefix + take, takwa, takeni = hske, hskwa, hskeni
define taGen {ta} -> {hs} ||  wordChar+ ppMarker _ k;

# r in pron prefixes becomes h if prefixed
define rToHR r -> {hr} || wordChar+ ppMarker _ e;
define rToH r-> h || wordChar+ ppMarker _ ;



#insert hidden h where needed
define removeHH hiddenH -> 0 || .#. ppMarker _ ;
define modifyHH hiddenH -> h ||  wordChar+ ppMarker _ ;

#  pronoun ke + k-verb + vowel -> k
# e.g. take + ken = takken
define keKCons e -> 0 || ppMarker ?+ k _ rootBM k \[h | k | t] ; 


define weakEK  e -> 0 || ppMarker [{etsh} | {yontat}]_ rootBM k \[h | k | t];


define commonPronPrefRules  taHs .o. taGen .o.
                            keKCons .o. weakEK .o. 
                            rToHR .o. rToH .o.
                            removeHH .o. modifyHH ;

#this script removes markup inserted by the lexicon 
# it may optionally be run after applying all rules


define removeAll [rootBM | ppMarker | punctMarker | perfMarker | habMarker | comMarker | futPref | condPref | defPast | hiddenH
    | teMarker | niMarker | condMarker | futMarker] -> 0;




#rules for phonological alternations of the prefix 'wa' used in punctual past (definitive)

#wa + k 
define waK [..] -> {'} || defPast {wa} _ ppMarker {k};

#wa + te or s or ty or tsy
define tePref [{te} | {s} | {ty} | {tsy}];
define waSe a -> e || defPast {w} _ ppMarker tePref ;

#wa + y
define waY y -> {'} || defPast {wa} ppMarker _ ;

#wa+wak
define waWake [defPast {wa} ppMarker {wak}] -> [defPast ppMarker {onk}];
define onkA [..] -> w || [defPast ppMarker {onk}] _ rootBM a;

#wa+etshe 
define waEtshe e -> {'} || defPast {wa} ppMarker _ {tsh};

#define waTak {ta} -> hs || defPast {wa} ppMarker _ k;
#define waHs hs -> hse || defPast {wa} ppMarker _ k rootBM [ k | h | y | t];

define waCore waK .o. waSe .o. waY .o. waWake .o. onkA .o. waEtshe;


#rules for phonological alternations of the prefix 'wa' used in punctual conditionals (indefinite)

# a + t, s -> ae
define aTS a -> {ae} || condMarker _ ppMarker [t | s];

# a + etsh -> atsh
define aEtshe e -> 0 || condMarker {a} ppMarker _ {tsh};

#a + wak+a -> aonkw+a
define aWaka {wak} -> {onkw} || condMarker {a} ppMarker _ rootBM a;

#a + wak + (!a) -> onk 
define aWake {wak} -> {onk} || condMarker {a} ppMarker _ rootBM (\a);

# a + ^PP^w + ^Root^ a
define aW [ppMarker w rootBM a] -> [ppMarker rootBM o n] || condMarker {a} _ ;

define aCore aTS .o. aEtshe .o. aWaka .o. aWake .o. aW;




#rules that specify phonological alternations for 
#the semantic prefixes of verbs:
# te- and ni- for now

#te prefix can be followed by either conditional or future prefix, or the pronom prefix
define nextPref [condMarker | futMarker | ppMarker ];

define teVowel e -> 0 || teMarker t _ nextPref [a | e];

#wa' + te -> wa't except when followed by t, s, wa, kh, hs
define sVariant [ t | s | {w} | {kh} | {hs}];
define waAndTe e -> 0 || defPast {wa}(') teMarker t _ ppMarker;
define waTeExcept [..] -> e || defPast {wa}(') teMarker t _ ppMarker sVariant;



#now ni prefixes
define nextPrefNi [condMarker | futMarker | defPast | ppMarker ];
define niVowel i -> 0 || niMarker n _ nextPrefNi [a | e];

#ni + wake = nonke
#define niWake niMarker {ni} ppMarker {wak} -> niMarker {n} ppMarker {onk};

define niWaStep1  i -> 0 || niMarker n _ defPast {wa};
define niWaStep2  w -> 0 || niMarker n defPast _ a;
#when ni + wa + (t,s, hs, wa, khe) = ne
define niWaExcept a -> e || niMarker n defPast _ ppMarker [ t | s ];

define niWaY y -> ' || niMarker {ni} defPast {wa} ppMarker _ ;
define niWaReg [niMarker {ni} defPast {wa}] -> niMarker {n} defPast {a} || _ (')ppMarker (?[ t|s ]);
define niWaS [niMarker {ni} defPast w [a| e]] -> niMarker {n} defPast {e} || _ ppMarker [t | s];
define niWaK [niMarker {ni} defPast w [a| e]] -> niMarker {n} defPast {a'} || _ ppMarker k;


define semPrefCore teVowel .o. waAndTe .o. waTeExcept .o. niVowel .o. niWaY .o. niWaReg .o. niWaS ;
#.o. niWaStep1 .o. niWaStep2 .o. niWaExcept;




#wa + k 
define enE e -> 0 || futMarker {en} ppMarker _ ;

define enCore enE;



regex eraseFlags .o. reWriteRed .o. reWriteBlue .o. reWritePurple .o. commonPronPrefRules .o. 
    waCore .o. aCore .o. enCore .o. semPrefCore .o. removeAll;
